Hawaii statutes.
[§321-235] Immunity and limitation on
liability for emergency aeromedical services. The State shall not be
liable for any claim of injury or death based on a failure to establish or
continue emergency aeromedical services in any part of the State or in any
county, including the failure of the department of health to establish
emergency aeromedical services. [L 2004, c 105, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next